Missouri, session 2026, HB2174.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 537.130, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 537.130, to read as follows:
537.130. 1. Any person or persons forming a part of an unlawful or riotous
assemblage shall be liable for any damage to person or property caused by the acts of such
assemblage, or of any person or persons unlawfully connected therewith.
2. Any person attempting to flee in a motor vehicle from an unlawful or riotous
assemblage shall not be criminally or civilly liable for any death or injury that may
result to any individual participating in the unlawful or riotous assemblage if the person
fleeing reasonably believes he or she or any occupant of the motor vehicle is in danger
and the person exercised due care at the time of the death or injury.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.